Colorado, session 2026A, HB1012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) At certain locations in the state, such as airports, event venues,
and hospitals, there is not a competitive market for ancillary goods and
services sold at those locations, and consumers at those locations are
captive to a seller's prices because the consumers' only choice is to pay
the price for an ancillary good or service or not purchase the good or
service;
(b) These "captive consumers" lack the ability to shop around for
a better price for a good or service; and
(c) While the existing prohibitions against unfair or deceptive
trade practices under the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act" apply to
excessive prices charged to captive consumers, a specific provision
making it an unfair or deceptive trade practice to charge captive
consumers with excessive prices should be added in the act to clarify the
existing law.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-737, amend
(2)(c)(I); and add (1)(c.5), (1)(f.3), (1)(f.5), (1)(h.5), and (2)(c.5) as
follows:
6-1-737. Requirement to disclose certain pricing information
- delivery service platforms - landlords and tenants - remedies - rules
-2- HB26-1012

- definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c.5) "DELIVERY SERVICE PLATFORM" MEANS AN ONLINE
APPLICATION, AN INTERNET SERVICE, OR OTHER ONLINE SYSTEM THAT A
PERSON USES TO FACILITATE, MANAGE, OR FACILITATE AND MANAGE THE
DELIVERY OF GOODS OR SERVICES.
(f.3) "GROCERY STORE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25-4-1602 (5.5).
(f.5) "IN-STORE PRICE" MEANS THE TOTAL PRICE FOR A GOOD THAT
A CONSUMER WOULD PAY ON SITE AT THE STORE FROM WHICH THE GOOD
IS BEING DELIVERED.
(h.5) "ON-APP PRICE" MEANS THE TOTAL PRICE FOR A GOOD THAT
IS SELECTED FOR PURCHASE AND DELIVERY THROUGH A DELIVERY SERVICE
PLATFORM.
(2) (c) (I) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
contrary, a delivery network company is compliant COMPLIES with
subsections (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this section if the delivery network
company does not use deceptive, unfair, and unconscionable acts or
practices related to the pricing of goods, services, or property and:
(A) Clearly and conspicuously discloses, at the point when a
consumer views and selects a vendor or goods or services for purchase,
that an additional flat fee, variable fee, or percentage fee is charged,
including the amount of or, in the case of a variable fee that is dependent
on consumer selections or distance and time, the factors determining the
fee, any mandatory fees associated with the transaction, and that the total
price of the services may vary;
(B) Provides an accurate description of the recipients and
-3- HB26-1012

purposes of the additional flat fee, variable fee, or percentage fee in
concise language; and
(C) WITH RESPECT TO GOODS, CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY
DISCLOSES, AT THE POINT WHEN THE CONSUMER VIEWS AND SELECTS A
GOOD FOR PURCHASE, A COMPARISON OF THE ON-APP PRICE FOR THE GOOD
AND THE IN-STORE PRICE FOR THE GOOD; AND
(C) (D) Displays, after a consumer selects a vendor or goods or
services for purchase but before completing the transaction, a subtotal
page that itemizes the price of the goods or services for purchase; and the
additional flat fee, variable fee, or percentage fee that is included in the
total price; AND, FOR GOODS PURCHASED, A COMPARISON OF THE
CUMULATIVE ON-APP PRICE FOR ALL GOODS SELECTED FOR PURCHASE AND
THE CUMULATIVE IN-STORE PRICE FOR ALL GOODS SELECTED FOR
PURCHASE.
(c.5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, A PERSON, INCLUDING A GROCERY STORE, COMPLIES WITH
SUBSECTIONS (2)(a) AND (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION IF THE PERSON DOES NOT
USE DECEPTIVE, UNFAIR, AND UNCONSCIONABLE ACTS OR PRACTICES
RELATED TO THE PRICING OF GOODS AND COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTIONS
(2)(c)(I)(C) AND (2)(c)(I)(D) OF THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO THE
PERSON'S DELIVERY SERVICE PLATFORM.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-741 as
follows:
6-1-741. Price gouging captive consumers prohibited -
definitions - rules.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
-4- HB26-1012

(a) (I) "CAPTIVE CONSUMER" MEANS A CONSUMER WHO IS AT A
LOCATION IN THE STATE AT WHICH A SELLER OF ANCILLARY GOODS OR
SERVICES DOES NOT HAVE COMPETITORS REGARDING THE ANCILLARY
GOODS OR SERVICES BEING SOLD.
(II) "CAPTIVE CONSUMER" INCLUDES A CONSUMER LOCATED:
(A) AT AN AIRPORT;
(B) IN A HOSPITAL OR AN EMERGENCY ROOM;
(C) AT AN EVENT VENUE WITH A SEATING OR STANDING CAPACITY
OF TWO THOUSAND OR MORE INDIVIDUALS;
(D) AT AN ORGANIZED OUTDOOR EVENT, SUCH AS A FAIR OR
FESTIVAL, FOR WHICH MORE THAN TWO THOUSAND ATTENDEES ARE
EXPECTED; OR
(E) IN A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(b) "CAPTIVE CONSUMER LOCATION" MEANS A LOCATION AT
WHICH CAPTIVE CONSUMERS ARE PRESENT.
(c) "CORRECTIONAL FACILITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-4.1-302 (1.3).
(2) (a) A PERSON IS PRESUMED TO BE ENGAGED IN AN UNFAIR OR
DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE IF THE PERSON CHARGES A CAPTIVE
CONSUMER A PRICE FOR AN ANCILLARY GOOD OR SERVICE THAT IS MORE
THAN THE AVERAGE PRICE OFFERED FOR A COMPARABLE GOOD OR SERVICE
SOLD IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CAPTIVE CONSUMER PURCHASES THE
ANCILLARY GOOD OR SERVICE.
(b) IF THE PRICE OF AN ANCILLARY GOOD OR SERVICE SOLD TO A
CAPTIVE CONSUMER EXCEEDS THE AVERAGE PRICE FOR COMPARABLE
GOODS OR SERVICES SOLD OR OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE SAME COUNTY,
THE SELLER OF THE ANCILLARY GOOD OR SERVICE MAY REBUT THE
-5- HB26-1012

PRESUMPTION THAT THE SELLER ENGAGED IN AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE BY DEMONSTRATING THAT THE PRICE OF THE ANCILLARY
GOOD OR SERVICE WAS NOT UNREASONABLY EXCESSIVE.
(3) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE PURSUANT TO SECTION 6-1-105 (1)(qqqq) AND IS
PRESUMED TO HAVE A SIGNIFICANT PUBLIC IMPACT.
(4) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING RULES TO ESTABLISH GUIDELINES FOR
DETERMINING WHAT AMOUNTS TO AN UNREASONABLY EXCESSIVE PRICE
IN CIRCUMSTANCES INVOLVING SALES TO CAPTIVE CONSUMERS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add
(1)(qqqq) as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(qqqq) VIOLATES SECTION 6-1-741.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1012

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-7- HB26-1012